Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 2. Disclosure Requirements; Authorized Fees.
§ 55.1-1811.
Fees for disclosure packet; associations not professionally managed.

An association that is not professionally managed may charge a fee for the preparation and issuance of the association disclosure packet required by §

55.1-1809

. Any fee shall reflect the actual cost of the preparation of the association disclosure packet, but shall not exceed $0.10 per page of copying costs or a total of $100 for all costs incurred in preparing the association disclosure packet. The seller or his authorized agent shall specify whether the association disclosure packet shall be delivered electronically or in hard copy and shall specify the complete contact information of the parties to whom the disclosure packet shall be delivered. If the seller or his authorized agent specifies that delivery shall be made to the purchaser or his authorized agent, the preparer shall provide the disclosure packet directly to the designated persons at the same time it is delivered to the seller or his authorized agent. The association shall advise the requester if electronic delivery of the disclosure packet or the disclosure packet update or financial update is not available, if electronic delivery has been requested by the seller or his authorized agent.

At the option of the seller or the seller’s authorized agent, with the consent of the association, a reasonable fee may be charged for (i) expediting the inspection, preparation, and delivery of the disclosure packet, if completed within five business days of the request, not to exceed $50; (ii) an additional hard copy of the disclosure packet not to exceed $25 per hard copy; and (iii) third-party commercial delivery service for hand delivery or overnight delivery of the association disclosure packet not to exceed an amount equal to the actual cost paid.

No fees other than those specified in this section shall be charged by the association for compliance with duties and responsibilities under this section. Any fees charged pursuant to this section shall be collected at the time of delivery of the disclosure packet. If unpaid, any such fees shall be an assessment against the lot and collectible as any other assessment in accordance with the provisions of the declaration and §

55.1-1833

. The seller may pay the association by cash, check, certified funds, or credit card, if credit card payment is an option offered by the association.

If an association disclosure packet has been issued for a lot within the preceding 12-month period, a person specified in the written instructions of the seller or his authorized agent, including the seller or his authorized agent, or the purchaser or his authorized agent may request a disclosure packet update. The requester shall specify whether the disclosure packet update shall be delivered electronically or in hard copy and shall specify the complete contact information of the parties to whom the specified update shall be delivered. The disclosure packet update shall be delivered within 10 days of the written request for such disclosure packet update.

The settlement agent may request a financial update. The requester shall specify whether the financial update shall be delivered electronically or in hard copy, and shall specify the complete contact information of the parties to whom the update shall be delivered. The financial update shall be delivered within three business days of the written request for such financial update.

A reasonable fee for the disclosure packet update or a financial update may be charged by the preparer not to exceed $50. At the option of the purchaser or his authorized agent, the requester may request that the association perform an additional inspection of the exterior of the dwelling unit and the lot, as authorized in the declaration, for a fee not to exceed $50. Any fees charged for the specified update shall be collected at the time of delivery of the update. The association shall not require cash, check, certified funds, or credit card payments at the time the request is made for the disclosure packet update. The requester may request that the specified update be provided in hard copy or in electronic form.

No association may require the requester to request the specified update electronically. The seller or his authorized agent shall continue to have the right to request a hard copy of the specified update in person at the association’s principal place of business. If the requester asks that the specified update be provided in electronic format, the association shall not require the requester to pay any fees to use the provider’s electronic network or system. If the requester asks that the specified update be provided in electronic format, the requester may designate no more than two additional recipients to receive the specified update in electronic format at no additional charge. A copy of the specified update shall be provided to the seller or his authorized agent.

When a disclosure packet has been delivered as required by §

55.1-1809

, the association shall, as to the purchaser, be bound by the statements set forth in the disclosure packet as to the status of the assessment account and the status of the lot with respect to any violation of the declaration, bylaws, rules and regulations, architectural guidelines, and articles of incorporation, if any, of the association as of the date of the statement unless the purchaser had actual knowledge that the contents of the disclosure packet were in error.

If the association has been requested to furnish the association disclosure packet required by this section, failure to provide the association disclosure packet substantially in the form provided in this section shall be deemed a waiver of any claim for delinquent assessments or of any violation of the declaration, bylaws, rules and regulations, or architectural guidelines existing as of the date of the request with respect to the subject lot. The association shall be liable to the seller in an amount equal to the actual damages sustained by the seller in an amount not to exceed $500. The purchaser shall nevertheless be obligated to abide by the declaration, bylaws, rules and regulations, and architectural guidelines of the association as to all matters arising after the date of the settlement of the sale.

No association may collect fees authorized by this section unless the association (i) is registered with the Common Interest Community Board, (ii) is current in filing the most recent annual report and fee with the Common Interest Community Board pursuant to §

55.1-1835

, and (iii) is current in paying any assessment made by the Common Interest Community Board pursuant to §

54.1-2354.5

.

An association that is not professionally managed may charge and collect fees for inspection of the property, the preparation and issuance of an association disclosure packet, and such other services as set out in §

55.1-1810

, provided that the association provides the disclosure packet electronically if so requested by the requester and otherwise complies with §

55.1-1810

.

History.

2008, cc. 851, 871, § 55-509.7; 2010, c. 165; 2011, c. 334; 2018, c. 226; 2019, cc. 391, 712.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 391 amended § 55-509.7 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2019, c. 712, the 2019 amendment has been given effect in the last sentence of subsection J, by inserting “and fee ” and “pursuant to §

55.1-1835

” in clause (ii) and deleting “the annual payment to the Common Interest Community Board pursuant to §

55.1-1835

and” following “current in paying” in clause (iii).

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “§

55.1-1835

” for “§ 55-516.1.”

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1812.
Properties subject to more than one declaration.

If the lot is subject to more than one declaration, the association or its common interest community manager may charge the fees authorized by §

55.1-1810

or

55.1-1811

for each of the applicable associations, provided, however, that no association shall charge inspection fees unless the association has architectural control over the lot.

History.

2008, cc. 851, 871, § 55-509.8; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1813.
Requests by settlement agents.

The settlement agent may request a financial update from the preparer of the disclosure packet. The preparer of the disclosure packet shall, upon request from the settlement agent, provide the settlement agent with written escrow instructions directing the amount of any funds to be paid from the settlement proceeds to the association or the common interest community manager. There shall be no fees charged for a response by the association or its common interest community manager to a request from the settlement agent for written escrow instructions. However, a fee may be charged for a financial update pursuant to this chapter.

The settlement agent, when transmitting funds to the association or the common interest community manager, shall, unless otherwise directed in writing, provide the preparer of the disclosure packet with (i) the complete record name of the seller, (ii) the address of the subject lot, (iii) the complete name of the purchaser, (iv) the date of settlement, and (v) a brief explanation of the application of any funds transmitted or by providing a copy of a settlement statement, unless otherwise prohibited.

History.

2008, cc. 851, 871, § 55-509.9; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1814.
Exceptions to disclosure requirements.

The contract disclosures required by §

55.1-1808

and the association disclosure packet required by §

55.1-1809

shall not be provided in the case of:

A disposition of a lot by gift;

A disposition of a lot pursuant to court order if the court so directs;

A disposition of a lot by foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure;

A disposition of a lot by a sale at an auction, where the association disclosure packet was made available as part of an auction package for prospective purchasers prior to the auction sale; or

A disposition of a lot to a person or entity who is not acquiring the lot for his own residence or for the construction thereon of a dwelling unit to be occupied as his own residence, unless requested by such person or entity. If such disclosures are not requested, a statement in the contract of sale that the purchaser is not acquiring the lot for such purpose shall be conclusive and may be relied upon by the seller of the lot. The person or entity acquiring the lot shall nevertheless be obligated to abide by the declaration, bylaws, rules and regulations, and architectural guidelines of the association as to all matters.

In any transaction in which an association disclosure packet is required and a trustee acts as the seller in the sale or resale of a lot, the trustee shall obtain the association disclosure packet from the association and provide the packet to the purchaser.

In the case of an initial disposition of a lot by the declarant, the association disclosure packet required by §

55.1-1809

need not include the information referenced in subdivisions A 2, 3, 5, or 9 of §

55.1-1809

, and it shall include the information referenced in subdivision A 18 of §

55.1-1809

only if the association has filed an annual report prior to the date of such disclosure packet.

History.

2008, cc. 851, 871, § 55-509.10; 2009, c. 69; 2013, c. 357; 2019, c. 712; 2020, c. 441.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 441 substituted “subdivision A 18” for “subdivision A 17” in subsection C.